Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The amounts  authorized, as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of gen-
eral obligation bonds of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium, notwithstanding section 10,
chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Center for
Excellence in Engineering
and Technology/Cornett
Hall Renovation..................... $ 2,050,000
(b) Oregon State University:
(A) Quality Foods and Beverage
Center ................................... $ 9,100,000
(B) Gilkey Hall Renovation ......... $ 2,050,000
(c) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility................. $ 36,485,000
(d) University of Oregon,
Campus for Accelerating
Scientific Impact ................... $ 50,620,000
(e) Western Oregon University:
(A) Information Technology
Center Renovation ................ $ 540,000
(B) Oregon Military Building
Renovation............................ $ 540,000
(f) Blue Mountain Community
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 1
College, Facility for
Agricultural Resource
Management.......................... $ 5,115,000
(g) Chemeketa Community
College, Agricultural
Complex................................. $ 6,125,000
(h) Clackamas Community College:
(A) DeJardin Building Addition... $ 8,140,000
(B) Student Services and
Community Commons ........... $ 8,140,000
(i) Clatsop Community College,
Marine Science Center
Renovation and Expansion.... $ 8,135,000
(j) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Middle College
Prototype Facility ................. $ 7,400,000
(k) Lane Community College,
Health Care Village Facility .. $ 8,140,000
(L) Linn-Benton Community
College, Student Advising
and Campus Safety Center ... $ 7,635,000
(m) Mt. Hood Community College,
Maywood Park Center........... $ 8,140,000
(n) Oregon Coast Community
College, Workforce Education
and Resiliency Center ........... $ 8,140,000
(o) Portland Community College,
Health Technology
Building Renovation.............. $ 8,140,000
(p) Rogue Community College,
Elk Building Science Facility
Renovation and Expansion.... $ 6,125,000
(q) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Dellwood Hall Remodel and
Expansion.............................. $ 2,805,000
(r) Treasure Valley Community
College, Workforce
Vocational Center ................. $ 2,865,000
(s) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Technology
Building................................. $ 8,140,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ............... $ 10,300,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ....... $ 101,180,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ........ $ 20,430,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ............................ $ 100,985,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 2
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Department of Corrections:
(A) Capital Improvements and
Renewal................................. $ 26,770,000
(B) Technology Infrastructure .... $ 12,445,000
(b) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Facility Improvements .......... $ 4,365,000
(c) Department of Human
Services, ONE Integrated
Eligibility and Medicaid
Eligibility System .................. $ 34,045,000
(d) Department of Justice,
Child Support Enforcement
Automated System ................ $ 16,585,000
(e) Department of Revenue,
Core Tax Revenue Systems
Replacement.......................... $ 4,855,000
(f) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(A) Lebanon Veteran’s Home
Parking Lot ........................... $ 1,345,000
(B) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements........... $ 1,195,000
(C) Roseburg Veterans’ Home .... $ 10,720,000
(g) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
Housing Program .................. $ 81,090,000
(h) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ... $ 50,620,000
(B) Eastern Oregon University,
Loso Hall Renovation ........... $ 5,575,000
(C) Oregon Institute of
Technology:
(i) Center for Excellence in
Engineering and Technology/
Cornett Hall Renovation ....... $ 38,475,000
(ii) Oregon Manufacturing
Innovation Center, Research
and Development Facility ..... $ 3,940,000
(D) Oregon State University:
(i) Cordley Hall Renovation ....... $ 15,250,000
(ii) Fairbanks Hall Renovation ... $ 11,220,000
(iii) Gilkey Hall Renovation ......... $ 1,045,000
(iv) Cascades Expansion Site
Reclamation .......................... $ 9,145,000
(E) Portland State University,
Graduate School of
Education Facility................. $ 9,145,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 3
(F) Southern Oregon
University, Central Hall
Capital Improvements........... $ 6,125,000
(G) Western Oregon University:
(i) Information Technology
Center Renovation ................ $ 5,070,000
(ii) Oregon Military Building
Renovation............................ $ 7,335,000
(i) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance,
and Safety ............................ $ 13,960,000
(j) Oregon Judicial Department:
(A) Lane County Courthouse ...... $ 5,115,000
(B) Multnomah County
Courthouse............................ $ 102,495,000
(C) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation.............. $ 6,125,000
(k) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension .......... $ 3,330,000
(B) Regional Armory Emergency
Enhancement Project ........... $ 8,675,000
(C) Regional Training Institute .. $ 6,630,000
(D) Resiliency Grant Fund .......... $ 5,070,000
(E) Youth Challenge Armory ...... $ 5,095,000
(L) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Capital Improvements........... $ 17,450,000
(B) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovation............................ $ 15,450,000
(C) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ....................... $ 7,095,000
(m) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife........................... $ 10,215,000
(n) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement . $ 774,225
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(7) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ................ $ 120,000,000
(8) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University:
(A) Land Acquisition for
University Center Building ... $ 15,260,000
(B) 12th & Market
Residence Hall....................... $ 54,225,000
(C) Graduate School of
Education Facility................. $ 6,080,000
(D) Corbett Building Purchase .... $ 5,100,000
(b) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Student
Recreation Center ................ $ 5,115,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 4
(c) Eastern Oregon University,
Track and Field Facilities
Restoration ........................... $ 790,000
(9) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ............... $ 10,000,000
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ......................... $ 25,000,000
(11) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Portland State Office
Building Improvements......... $ 13,360,000
(b) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement . $ 1,075,775
Total General Obligation
Bonds ....................................  $ 1,257,310,000
SECTION 2. The amounts authorized, as provided  by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of re-
venue bonds of the state during the 2017-2019 biennium are as follows:
REVENUE BONDS
Direct Revenue Bonds
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 300,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department ........................... $ 30,000,000   
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Lottery Revenue Bonds ........ $ 199,860,000
Total Direct Revenue
Bonds .................................... $ 529,860,000
Pass-Through Revenue Bonds
Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds............... $ 400,000,000
Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program ................................ $ 10,000,000
Oregon Facilities Authority .. $ 1,350,000,000
Housing and Community
Services Department ............. $ 325,000,000
Total Pass-Through Revenue
Bonds ....................................  $ 2,085,000,000
Total Revenue Bonds .................... $ 2,614,860,000
SECTION 3. The amount authorized, as provided by ORS  286A.035, for issuance of cer-
tificates of participation and other financing agreements  of the state during the 2017-2019
biennium for the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is $110,985,000.
SECTION 4. The amounts allocated for private activity bonds, as provided in ORS
286A.615, are as follows:
(1) For calendar year 2018,
the amount of $409,346,500
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 5
is allocated as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 5,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $125,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $239,346,500
(2) For calendar year 2019,
the amount of $409,346,500
is allocated as follows:
(a) Oregon Business Development
Department, Industrial
Development Bonds................... $ 40,000,000
(b) Oregon Business Development
Department, Beginning and
Expanding Farmer Loan
Program .................................... $ 5,000,000
(c) Housing and Community
Services Department ................. $125,000,000
(d) Private Activity Bond
Committee................................. $239,346,500
(3) If an increase in this state’s population, a
sufficient increase in the region’s Consumer
Price Index or a change in federal law allows
the private activity bond limit as set by the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to
exceed $409,346,500 during the 2018 calendar
year or $409,346,500 during the 2019 calendar
year, the increase is allocated to the Private
Activity Bond Committee.
SECTION 5.
(1) For purposes of Article XI-F(1), section 1, of  the Oregon Constitution,
the Legislative Assembly determines that the projects  authorized to be financed pursuant to
section 1 (8) of this 2017 Act with bonds issued under Article XI-F(1) of the Oregon  Consti-
tution will benefit higher education institutions or activities.
(2) For purposes of Article  XI-G, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, the Legislative
Assembly determines that the projects authorized  to be financed pursuant to section 1 (1)
of this 2017 Act  with bonds issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution will benefit
higher education institutions or activities or community colleges authorized by law to receive
state aid.
SECTION 6.
Bonds authorized under section 1 (1) of this  2017 Act may not be issued until
the constructing authority certifies that the constructing authority has matching  funds
available for  the same or similar purposes as the Article XI-G bonds that will fund the grant
to the constructing authority, that the match funds are not proceeds of  indebtedness in-
curred by the state under any other article  of the Oregon Constitution, and that the match
funds are available to the constructing authority in an amount at least equal to  the amount
of indebtedness incurred by the state through the issuance of the Article XI-G bonds.
SECTION 7.  ORS 286A.833 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 6
286A.833. (1) In accordance with the applicable  provisions of this chapter, the State Treasurer,
with the concurrence of the  [ Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] Higher
Education Coordinating Commission, may issue  Article XI-F(1) bonds for the benefit of a public
university if:
(a) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Director of the Oregon  Department of
Administrative Services  requests that  bonds be issued for the purposes specified in Article XI-F(1)
of the Oregon Constitution, plus an amount  determined by the State Treasurer to pay estimated
bond-related costs;
(b) The issuance does not exceed the budget authorization for bond issuance established  under
ORS 286A.035; and
(c) A loan agreement is executed under ORS 286A.836 prior to sale of the bonds.
(2) The State Treasurer may issue Article XI-F(1) bonds for the  purpose of refunding Article
XI-F(1) bonds, with the concurrence of a  public university that received proceeds of Article XI-F(1)
bonds to be refunded.
(3) The State Treasurer shall deposit the net proceeds of Article XI-F(1) bonds in one  or more
project funds established  in the State Treasury or with a third party under contract with the Oregon
Department of  Administrative Services and approved by the State Treasurer. Net proceeds of Article
XI-F(1) bonds must be expended for the purposes  described in the commission’s budget authorization.
(4) If at  any time the department and the commission jointly determine that the net proceeds
of Article XI-F(1) bonds deposited  in a project fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section exceed
the cost of the project described in the commission’s budget authorization, the department may  al-
locate and transfer the excess amount as determined by  the department to other project funds, the
Article XI-F(1) Bond  Fund established under ORS 286A.839 or the Article XI-F(1) Bond Adminis-
tration Fund established under ORS 286A.842.  Before transferring an excess amount under this
subsection, the department shall consult with the public  university for whose benefit the Article
XI-F(1) bonds were issued, but the department may transfer an excess amount without the approval
of the public university.  Excess amounts may not be transferred to a project fund for the project
of another  public university unless the applicable loan agreements and loan repayment schedules
are amended to reflect the transfer.
(5) Article XI-F(1) bonds are direct general obligations of the State of  Oregon and must contain
a direct promise on behalf of the State of Oregon to pay the principal  of, the interest on and the
premium, if any, on the Article XI-F(1)  bonds. The State of Oregon shall pledge its full faith and
credit and taxing power to the payment of the principal  of, the interest on and the premium, if any,
on Article XI-F(1) bonds, and the  ad valorem taxing power of the State of Oregon may be pledged
to pay Article XI-F(1) bonds.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 283.085 is amended to read:
283.085. As used in ORS 283.085 to 283.092:
(1) “Available funds”  means funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislative
Assembly to pay amounts due under a financing  agreement for the fiscal period in which the pay-
ments are due, unexpended proceeds  of the financing agreement and reserves or other amounts that
have been deposited in trust to pay amounts due under the financing agreement.
(2) “Credit enhancement agreement” means  any agreement or contractual relationship between
the state and any bank,  trust company, insurance company, surety bonding company, pension fund
or other financial institution providing additional credit on  or security for a financing agreement
or certificates of participation authorized by ORS 283.085 to 283.092.
(3) “Financing  agreement” means a lease purchase agreement, an installment sale agreement, a
loan agreement or any other agreement:
(a) To  finance real or personal property that is or will be owned and operated by the state or
any of its agencies;
(b) To finance infrastructure, including but not limited to telecommunications  systems, systems
for water, sewage, electricity,  steam or natural gas and other equipment or improvements that are
necessary or appropriate to support a facility that is, or will be, owned or operated by the state;
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 7
(c) To finance  infrastructure components that are, or will be, owned or operated by a local
government agency of this state if the  Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices determines that financing the infrastructure facilitates the construction or operation of  an
adult or  juvenile corrections facility or a public safety training facility owned or operated by the
state or any of its agencies;
(d) To finance all or a portion of the state’s pension  liabilities for retirement, health care or
disability benefits, in an  amount that produces net proceeds that do not exceed the State Treasurer’s
estimate of those liabilities based on information provided to the  State Treasurer by the Public
Employees Retirement System; [ or]
(e) To finance:
(A) The release of  all or a portion of the Elliott State Forest from restrictions resulting
from ownership of that forest by the Common School Fund; or
(B) Compensation paid to the Common School Fund for  the preservation of noneconomic
benefits of the forest through the  imposition, transfer or sale of restrictions such as ease-
ments, use requirements or other methods that preserve noneconomic  benefits of the forest
for the public,  including recreation, aesthetics, wildlife or habitat preservation or other en-
vironmental and quality of life considerations; or
[(e)] (f)  To refinance previously executed financing agreements.
(4) “Financing costs” means costs or expenses that the  director determines are necessary or
desirable in connection with entering into financing agreements  and maintaining the certificate of
participation program, including but not limited to payment of:
(a) Amounts due under financing agreements;
(b) Costs and obligations the director or any other agency  of the state incurs in connection with
the exercise of a power granted by ORS 283.085 to 283.092; and
(c) Amounts due in connection with the investment of proceeds of financing agreements.
(5) “Personal property” means tangible personal property, software and fixtures.
(6) “Property rights” means, with respect to personal property, the rights of a secured  party
under ORS chapter  79, and, with respect to real property, the rights of a trustee or lender under a
lease authorized by ORS 283.089 (1)(e).
(7) “Software” means software and training and maintenance contracts related to the  operation
of computing equipment.
SECTION 9.
(1) A community college for  which one project to be funded with general
obligation bonds authorized to  be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution is
approved in this 2017 Act may not request approval of  an additional project to be funded with
general obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the  Oregon Constitu-
tion until the beginning of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly held in 2021, un-
less the community college withdraws the project approved under this 2017 Act.
(2) A community college for which two projects to be  funded with general obligation
bonds authorized to be issued under Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution is  approved in
this 2017 Act may not request approval of an additional project to be funded with general
obligation bonds authorized to be issued under Article  XI-G of the Oregon Constitution until
the beginning of the regular session of the Legislative Assembly held  in 2025, unless the
community college withdraws a project approved under this 2017 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(j)(A) of this 2017 Act, the
State Treasurer may issue  Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $5,000,000 of net
proceeds for the purposes and in the manner  specified in section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws
2013, plus an amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(2) Out of the amount specified in section 1 (6)(j)(B) of this 2017 Act, the State Treasurer
may issue Article XI-Q bonds in an amount not to exceed $92,600,000 of  net proceeds for the
purposes and in the manner specified in section 8, chapter 705,  Oregon Laws 2013, plus an
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 8
(3) For  purposes of sections 8 and 9, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013, and section 64,
chapter 723, Oregon Laws 2013, bonds issued pursuant to this section  are considered to be
bonds issued pursuant to section 8, chapter 705, Oregon Laws 2013.
(4) Bonds may not be  issued out of the amounts specified in section 1 (6)(j)(A) and (B)
of this 2017 Act except as provided in this section.
SECTION 11. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Apprentice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(b) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the meaning given that term in ORS 660.010.
(c) “Apprenticeship training program” means the total system of  apprenticeship that a
particular local joint committee, as defined in ORS 660.010, operates, including the local joint
committee’s registered standards and all other terms and conditions for  qualifying, recruit-
ing, selecting, employing and training apprentices in an apprenticeable occupation.
(d) “Minority individual” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(e) “Qualified contracts” means contracts that:
(A) Are for improvements to real property in connection with the  University of Oregon
Campus for Accelerating Scientific Impact;
(B) Have a  cost that, at the time the contract is executed, is estimated to be greater
than $200,000; and
(C) Are to be paid from proceeds of bonds issued under Article XI-G of  the Oregon Con-
stitution.
(f) “Woman” has the meaning given that term in ORS 200.005.
(2) The University of Oregon, in all qualified contracts, shall require contractors to:
(a) Employ apprentices to perform 15 percent of the  work hours that workers in
apprenticeable occupations perform under the contract, in a manner  consistent with the
apprentices’ respective apprenticeship training programs;
(b) Establish and execute a  plan for outreach, recruitment and retention of women and
minority individuals to perform work under the contract; and
(c) Require any subcontractors engaged by the contractors to abide by  the requirements
set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(3) On or before February 1 of each year, the University of  Oregon shall report to the
Joint Committee on Ways and Means or Joint Interim Committee on  Ways and Means on
the amount of work performed by apprentices, women  and minority individuals under quali-
fied contracts.
SECTION 12.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 9
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 10